src-fst-phonology.twolc.md
**К1 %{КТ%}:к left**  
* *кунда>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *кунда00к0*

**К1 %{КТ%}:к right**  
* *кунда>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *кунда00к0*

**К1 %{КТ%}:0 **
кельгомс+V+ConNegII:
* *кельг>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *кельк%>000*

**%{ЬØ%}:ь**  

* *пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *пан0%>ть*
симомс+V+Imprt+ScSg2
* *сим%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *сип%>0ть*
* ★*сим%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}* (is not standard language)
* ★*сип%>0т0* (is not standard language)

**%{ЬØ%}:0**  
зепе+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: **pocket/tasku**
* *зеп%{ЕОØ%}%^RmVow%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}*
* *зеп00%>0т0*

ши+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: **day/päivä**
* *ши%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}*
* *ши%>0т0*
* *пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *пан0%>ть*
вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: **window/ikkuna**
* *вальмя%^Я2А%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}*
* *вальма0%>0т0*

Plural before definite plural following a consonant
**t:0**  
Ананьина К.И. 2000: 55
* *ава%>%{Х%}тне*
* *ава%>0тне*
* *шуфт%>%{Х%}тне*
* *шуфт%>0тне*
* *нармот0%>0тне*
* *лав%>%{Х%}тне*
* *лаф%>00не*
* ★*лав%>%{Х%}тне* (is not standard language)
* ★*лаф%>0тне* (is not standard language)

**s:0**  

* *класс%>SLossс*
* *клас000с*

**y:0**  
plural
* *пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}*
* *пан0%>ть*
ведь+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: **a little water**
* *ведь%>%{DIM%}я*
* *вед0%>ня*
* *ингольдень>не*
* *ингольден0>не*

* *мяль%>%{ЕОØ%}зе*
* *мял0%>езе*
мирде+N+Sg+Nom: **husband/aviomies**
* *мирдь%{ЕØ%}#*
* *мирд0е#*
кядь+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: **hand; arm**
* *кядь%^PXSG1%>не*
* *кяд00%>не*

учемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3
* *учь%>сь*
* *уч0%>сь*

нярь+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: **hand; arm**
* *нярь%>це*
* *няр0%>це*

* *афоль%>ине*
* *афол0%>ине*

изь+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: **they did not**
* *изь%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>ть*
* *ис000%>ть*
ломань+N+SP+Abl+Indef:
* ★*ломань%>д%{АО%}* (is not standard language)
* ★*ломань%>да* (is not standard language)

### DIMINUTIVES
**%{DIM%}:н**
* *ши%>%{DIM%}я*
* *ши%>ня*
* *ара%>%{ИЫЙ%}%>%{DIM%}я*
* *ара%>й%>ня*

**%{DIM%}:к**
* *пикс>%{DIM%}я*
* *пикс0кя*

**%{ъØ%}:ъ**

## Disallow

**Disallow TLoss after non-t**  

**Disallow KLoss after non-k**  

**Disallow SLoss after non-s**  

**Disallow овок**

**Disallow Онга**
* ★*куд>{ЕОØ}нз{АО}>{ЕОØ}н>нг{АЕ}* (is not standard language)
* ★*куд>онзо>0н>нга* (is not standard language)

**Disallow -кс: нетькскс**

**Disallow -гя only after a few**

**Disallow special imperative in K after vowel stems**

**Disallow final е lowering to я tag elsewhere**

**Disallow onset vowel after voiced cons**

**Disallow Ь2ZERO**

**Disallow ЬKEEP**

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-mdf/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
